Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2007
Violations; penalty.

Any unauthorized insurer who transacts any unauthorized act of an insurance business as set forth in sections 44-2001 to 44-2008 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 351, § 7, p. 1231;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 247.